etc/dictionaries/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX b5 Y 191
SFX b5 er er/93 er 54
SFX b5 er ant/21 [^c]er 41
SFX b5 cer çant/21 cer 41
SFX b5 ecer èce/55 ecer 39
SFX b5 emer ème/55 emer 39
SFX b5 ener ène/55 ener 39
SFX b5 eper èpe/55 eper 39
SFX b5 erer ère/55 erer 39
SFX b5 eser èse/55 eser 39
SFX b5 ever ève/55 ever 39
SFX b5 evrer èvre/55 evrer 39
SFX b5 eter ète/55 eter 39
SFX b5 eler èle/55 eler 39
SFX b5 er è/34 er 117
SFX b5 ecer èces/34 ecer 40
SFX b5 emer èmes/34 emer 40
SFX b5 ener ènes/34 ener 40
SFX b5 eper èpes/34 eper 40
SFX b5 erer ères/34 erer 40
SFX b5 eser èses/34 eser 40
SFX b5 ever èves/34 ever 40
SFX b5 evrer èvres/34 evrer 40
SFX b5 eter ètes/34 eter 40
SFX b5 eler èles/34 eler 40
SFX b5 er ons/29 [^c]er 46
SFX b5 cer çons/29 cer 46
SFX b5 er ez/26 er 61
SFX b5 ecer ècent/21 ecer 35
SFX b5 emer èment/21 emer 35
SFX b5 ener ènent/21 ener 35
SFX b5 eper èpent/21 eper 35
SFX b5 erer èrent/21 erer 35
SFX b5 eser èsent/21 eser 35
SFX b5 ever èvent/21 ever 35
SFX b5 evrer èvrent/21 evrer 35
SFX b5 eter ètent/21 eter 35
SFX b5 eler èlent/21 eler 35
SFX b5 er ais/31 [^c]er 53
SFX b5 cer çais/31 cer 53
SFX b5 er ait/21 [^c]er 43
SFX b5 cer çait/21 cer 43
SFX b5 er ions/29 er 66
SFX b5 er iez/26 er 65
SFX b5 er aient/21 [^c]er 44
SFX b5 cer çaient/21 cer 44
SFX b5 er ai/31 [^c]er 87
SFX b5 cer çai/31 cer 87
SFX b5 er as/34 [^c]er 86
SFX b5 cer ças/34 cer 86
SFX b5 er a/21 [^c]er 55
SFX b5 cer ça/21 cer 55
SFX b5 er âmes/29 [^c]er 49
SFX b5 cer çâmes/29 cer 49
SFX b5 er âtes/26 [^c]er 48
SFX b5 cer çâtes/26 cer 48
SFX b5 er èrent/21 er 62
SFX b5 ecer ècerai/31 ecer 33
SFX b5 emer èmerai/31 emer 33
SFX b5 ener ènerai/31 ener 33
SFX b5 eper èperai/31 eper 33
SFX b5 erer èrerai/31 erer 33
SFX b5 eser èserai/31 eser 33
SFX b5 ever èverai/31 ever 33
SFX b5 evrer èvrerai/31 evrer 33
SFX b5 eter èterai/31 eter 33
SFX b5 eler èlerai/31 eler 33
SFX b5 ecer èceras/34 ecer 32
SFX b5 emer èmeras/34 emer 32
SFX b5 ener èneras/34 ener 32
SFX b5 eper èperas/34 eper 32
SFX b5 erer èreras/34 erer 32
SFX b5 eser èseras/34 eser 32
SFX b5 ever èveras/34 ever 32
SFX b5 evrer èvreras/34 evrer 32
SFX b5 eter èteras/34 eter 32
SFX b5 eler èleras/34 eler 32
SFX b5 ecer ècera/21 ecer 23
SFX b5 emer èmera/21 emer 23
SFX b5 ener ènera/21 ener 23
SFX b5 eper èpera/21 eper 23
SFX b5 erer èrera/21 erer 23
SFX b5 eser èsera/21 eser 23
SFX b5 ever èvera/21 ever 23
SFX b5 evrer èvrera/21 evrer 23
SFX b5 eter ètera/21 eter 23
SFX b5 eler èlera/21 eler 23
SFX b5 ecer ècerons/29 ecer 28
SFX b5 emer èmerons/29 emer 28
SFX b5 ener ènerons/29 ener 28
SFX b5 eper èperons/29 eper 28
SFX b5 erer èrerons/29 erer 28
SFX b5 eser èserons/29 eser 28
SFX b5 ever èverons/29 ever 28
SFX b5 evrer èvrerons/29 evrer 28
SFX b5 eter èterons/29 eter 28
SFX b5 eler èlerons/29 eler 28
SFX b5 ecer ècerez/26 ecer 27
SFX b5 emer èmerez/26 emer 27
SFX b5 ener ènerez/26 ener 27
SFX b5 eper èperez/26 eper 27
SFX b5 erer èrerez/26 erer 27
SFX b5 eser èserez/26 eser 27
SFX b5 ever èverez/26 ever 27
SFX b5 evrer èvrerez/26 evrer 27
SFX b5 eter èterez/26 eter 27
SFX b5 eler èlerez/26 eler 27
SFX b5 ecer èceront/21 ecer 26
SFX b5 emer èmeront/21 emer 26
SFX b5 ener èneront/21 ener 26
SFX b5 eper èperont/21 eper 26
SFX b5 erer èreront/21 erer 26
SFX b5 eser èseront/21 eser 26
SFX b5 ever èveront/21 ever 26
SFX b5 evrer èvreront/21 evrer 26
SFX b5 eter èteront/21 eter 26
SFX b5 eler èleront/21 eler 26
SFX b5 ecer ècerais/31 ecer 34
SFX b5 emer èmerais/31 emer 34
SFX b5 ener ènerais/31 ener 34
SFX b5 eper èperais/31 eper 34
SFX b5 erer èrerais/31 erer 34
SFX b5 eser èserais/31 eser 34
SFX b5 ever èverais/31 ever 34
SFX b5 evrer èvrerais/31 evrer 34
SFX b5 eter èterais/31 eter 34
SFX b5 eler èlerais/31 eler 34
SFX b5 ecer ècerait/21 ecer 24
SFX b5 emer èmerait/21 emer 24
SFX b5 ener ènerait/21 ener 24
SFX b5 eper èperait/21 eper 24
SFX b5 erer èrerait/21 erer 24
SFX b5 eser èserait/21 eser 24
SFX b5 ever èverait/21 ever 24
SFX b5 evrer èvrerait/21 evrer 24
SFX b5 eter èterait/21 eter 24
SFX b5 eler èlerait/21 eler 24
SFX b5 ecer ècerions/29 ecer 30
SFX b5 emer èmerions/29 emer 30
SFX b5 ener ènerions/29 ener 30
SFX b5 eper èperions/29 eper 30
SFX b5 erer èrerions/29 erer 30
SFX b5 eser èserions/29 eser 30
SFX b5 ever èverions/29 ever 30
SFX b5 evrer èvrerions/29 evrer 30
SFX b5 eter èterions/29 eter 30
SFX b5 eler èlerions/29 eler 30
SFX b5 ecer èceriez/26 ecer 29
SFX b5 emer èmeriez/26 emer 29
SFX b5 ener èneriez/26 ener 29
SFX b5 eper èperiez/26 eper 29
SFX b5 erer èreriez/26 erer 29
SFX b5 eser èseriez/26 eser 29
SFX b5 ever èveriez/26 ever 29
SFX b5 evrer èvreriez/26 evrer 29
SFX b5 eter èteriez/26 eter 29
SFX b5 eler èleriez/26 eler 29
SFX b5 ecer èceraient/21 ecer 25
SFX b5 emer èmeraient/21 emer 25
SFX b5 ener èneraient/21 ener 25
SFX b5 eper èperaient/21 eper 25
SFX b5 erer èreraient/21 erer 25
SFX b5 eser èseraient/21 eser 25
SFX b5 ever èveraient/21 ever 25
SFX b5 evrer èvreraient/21 evrer 25
SFX b5 eter èteraient/21 eter 25
SFX b5 eler èleraient/21 eler 25
SFX b5 er asse/31 [^c]er 59
SFX b5 cer çasse/31 cer 59
SFX b5 er asses/34 [^c]er 58
SFX b5 cer çasses/34 cer 58
SFX b5 er ât/21 [^c]er 45
SFX b5 cer çât/21 cer 45
SFX b5 er assions/29 [^c]er 57
SFX b5 cer çassions/29 cer 57
SFX b5 er assiez/26 [^c]er 56
SFX b5 cer çassiez/26 cer 56
SFX b5 er assent/21 [^c]er 52
SFX b5 cer çassent/21 cer 52
SFX b5 ecer èce/26 ecer 31
SFX b5 emer ème/26 emer 31
SFX b5 ener ène/26 ener 31
SFX b5 eper èpe/26 eper 31
SFX b5 erer ère/26 erer 31
SFX b5 eser èse/26 eser 31
SFX b5 ever ève/26 ever 31
SFX b5 evrer èvre/26 evrer 31
SFX b5 eter ète/26 eter 31
SFX b5 eler èle/26 eler 31
SFX b5 er ons/15 [^c]er 47
SFX b5 cer çons/15 cer 47
SFX b5 er ez/15 er 63
